Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 20 Big River Reservoir Moratorium

37-20-1.
Big River Reservoir — Development prohibited.

All land acquired by the state or any subdivision thereof for the development of the “Big River Reservoir” so-called, including any land acquired by the Big River — Wood River Reservoir Site Acquisition Act, P.L. 1964, ch. 133, shall not be sold nor shall the land be developed in any way. The state shall not allow any future development or continued development on that property, and the property shall be designated “open space” as defined in §

45-36-1(1)

— (7).

Provided, however, that the foregoing shall not be construed to prohibit the use of the said property as a water reservoir, or for the development of wells and well sites together with any infrastructure necessary for the treatment, transmission, storage and distribution of drinking water if the water resources board determines that exploration or development of groundwater is appropriate, then it shall not require legislative action to remove the property from the “open space” for the purposes of groundwater development as defined in §

45-36-1(1)

— (8).

Non-motorized bicycles are permitted upon and along land designated as the “Big River Management Area”. The water resources board, in consultation with the department of environmental management shall within thirty (30) days of the passage of this act adopt rules and regulations that include but are not limited to the appropriate designated areas and defined hours for said uses in the management area.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 220, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 5; P.L. 2009, ch. 378, § 1.